Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-102
Department; supervision and control of specified financial institutions; declaration of public purpose; director; order, decision, or determination; authority to prescribe conditions.

(1) The department shall, under the laws of this state specifically made applicable to each, have general supervision and control over banks, trust companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, and digital asset depositories, all of which are hereby declared to be quasi-public in nature and subject to regulation and control by the state.

(2) The director may prescribe conditions on banks, trust companies, credit unions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, and digital asset depositories, and their holding companies, if any, as part of any written order, decision, or determination required to be made pursuant to the Credit Union Act, the Nebraska Banking Act, the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, and Chapter 8, article 3.

Laws 1963, c. 29, § 2, p. 134;

Laws 2002, LB 1094, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 131, § 2;

Laws 2017, LB140, § 3;

Laws 2021, LB649, § 34;

Laws 2023, LB92, § 2.

Credit Union Act, see section 21-1701.

Nebraska Financial Innovation Act, see section 8-3001.

Supervision and control extends to branches. First Fed. Sav. & Loan Assn. v. Department of Banking, 187 Neb. 562, 192 N.W.2d 736 (1971).